michif-ipa.lexc
Multichar_Symbols aː oː ʰp ʰt ʰk ʰʧ ã ɛ̃ ɪ̃ ɔ̃

LEXICON Root 
KnownMappings ;
UnknownMappings ;

LEXICON KnownMappings
KnownVowels ;
KnownConsonants ;

LEXICON KnownConsonants
! Stops
ʰp:hp # ;
p # ;
b # ;

ʰt:ht # ;
t # ;
d # ;

ʰk:hk # ;
k #;
ɡ:g # ;

! Fricatives
f # ;
v # ;

s # ;
z # ;

ʃ:sh # ;
ʒ:zh # ;

h # ;

! Affricates
ʰʧ:hch # ;
ʧ:ch # ;
!!!dunno how to write /ʤ/!!!

m # ;
n # ;

r # ;
l # ;

w # ;
j:y # ;


LEXICON KnownVowels
OralVowels ;
NasalizedVowels ;


LEXICON OralVowels
a # ;
aː:aa # ;
æ:ae # ;
ɛ:e # ;
e:ee # ;
ɪ:i # ;
i:ii # ;
ɔ:o # ;
oː:oo # ;
ʊ:u # ;
u:uu # ;


LEXICON NasalizedVowels
ã:aꞥ # ;
ɛ̃:eꞥ # ;
ɪ̃:iꞥ # ;
ɔ̃:oꞥ # ;


LEXICON UnknownMappings
œ:� # ;
ɑ:� # ;
y:� # ;
ʤ:� # ;
